morphology_project/icelandic.xfst
clear stack

read lexc icelandic.lexc

define Lexicon ;

regex Lexicon ;

define Flags %@P%.WEAK%.AR%@ | %@P%.WEAK%.UR%@ | %@P%.MASC%.UR1%@ | %@P%.MASC%.UR2%@ | %@P%.MASC%.UR3%@ | %@R%.WEAK%.UR%@ | %@R%.MASC%.UR3%@ | %@D%.MASC%.UR3%@ |
		 %@R%.MASC%.UR1%@ | %@D%.MASC%.UR1%@ ;

define Vowels a | e | i | o | u | y | ö | ú | ý | í  ;

define Consonants b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | r | s | t | v | þ | ð ;

define DeleteI I -> 0 || Vowels | Vowels %^ | Vowels Flags _ ;

define AddJ 0 -> j || Vowels _ %^ Vowels |  Flags %^ Vowels ;

define Itoi I -> i || _ ;

define AToÖ a -> ö || Consonants+ _ Consonants+ %^ u m | Consonants+ %^ u n | Consonants+ Flags %^ u m | Consonants+ Flags %^ u n ;

define IIToI i i -> i || _ ;

define KiliToKli k i l %^ i -> k l i || _ n u ;

define RemoveI i -> 0 || _ l %^ u | l %^ a | l %^ i .#. | l Flags %^ u | l Flags %^ a | l Flags %^ i .#. ;

define RemoveU u -> 0 || Vowels Consonants _ Consonants+ %^ a | Consonants+ %^ u ;

define UmnumToNum u m n u m -> u n u m || _ ;

define óToæ ó -> æ || _ Consonants+ %^ u r | Consonants+ Flags %^ u r ;

define aToe a -> e || Vowels+ _ Consonants+ %^ u |  Consonants+ Flags %^ u;

define CleanUp %^ -> 0 ;

regex Lexicon .o. DeleteI .o. AddJ .o. IIToI .o. UmnumToNum .o. KiliToKli .o. 
               RemoveI .o. Itoi .o. RemoveU .o. aToe .o. AToÖ .o. óToæ .o. CleanUp ;

print lower-words
